src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Klingon nouns have a number of suffixes arranged after each other for
!! lots of stuff.

LEXICON Augmentation
!! Augmentation is used for more or less important, bigger, smaller etc.
!! €gt-norm: Nominal augmentation
!! Qagh Qagh+N+Sg+Nom error
!! Qagh’a’ Qagh+N+Aug+Sg+Nom huge mistake
!! QaghHom Qagh+N+Dim+Sg+Nom small mistake
+Aug:’a’    Number? ;
+Dim:Hom    Number? ;

LEXICON Number
!! Plural is marked by some suffixes
!! €gt-norm: nominal plurals
!! € Qaghpu’ Qagh+N+Pl+Nom
+Pl:pu’ NounQualification?  ;
+Pl:Du’ NounQualification?  ;
+Pl:mey NounQualification?  ;
+Pl:ray NounQualification?  ;

LEXICON NounQualification
!! Nouns are qualified by some other suffixes too
!! €gt-norm: nominal qualification
!! € Qaghqoq Qagh+N+Sg+Foc/qoq+Nom error qoq
+Foc/qoq:qoq    Possession? ;
+Foc/Hey:Hey    Possession? ;
+Foc/na:na      Possession? ;

LEXICON Possession
!! The possessor is marked in suffix too
!! €gt-norm: Nominal possession
!! € QaghwIJ Qagh+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom my error
+PxSg1:wIj  Cases?  ;
+PxSg2:lIj  Cases?  ;
+PxSg3:Daj  Cases?  ;
+PxPl1:maj  Cases?  ;
+PxPl2:raj  Cases?  ;
+PxPl3:chaj Cases?  ;
+PxSg1:wI’  Cases?  ;
+PxSg2:lI’  Cases?  ;
+PxPl1:ma’  Cases?  ;
+PxPl2:ra’  Cases?  ;
+Foc/this:vam   Cases?  ;
+Foc/that:vetlh Cases?  ;

LEXICON Cases
!! cases add some semantic relations as usual
!! €gt-norm: Nominal cases
!! € QaghDaq Qagh+N+Sg+Loc in an error
!! € Qaghvo’ Qagh+N+Sg+Sep from an error
+Loc:Daq    #   ;
+Sep:vo’    #   ;
+Ins:mo’    #   ;
+Bnf:vaD    #   ;
+Foc:’e’    #   ;

! Shorthands

LEXICON Augmentation?
!! augmentation is optional
0   Augmentation ;
0   Number?  ;

LEXICON Number?
!! number marker is optional, singular being the unmarked form
0   Number  ;
+Sg:0   NounQualification?  ;

LEXICON NounQualification?
!! qualification is optional
0   NounQualification   ;
0   Possession?  ;

LEXICON Possession?
!! possession is optional
0   Possession  ;
0   Cases?  ;

LEXICON Cases?
!! case marker is optional, nominative being the unmarked form
0       Cases   ;
+Nom:0  #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
