src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----

!! Nouns in Klingon language are things. Noo, they __denote__ things.

LEXICON Nouns
Sus     Augmentation?    ;
Qagh    Augmentation?    ;
woQ     Augmentation?    ;
roj     Augmentation?    ;
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
